src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-kwedad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kʷədad: # Verb pg 207 'eng grab sm' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     kʷədad+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcSg1: ʔukʷədac # grabbed me 
     kʷədad+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcSg2: ʔukʷədacid # grabbed you Sg 
     kʷədad+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcSP3: ʔukʷədad # grabbed him/her/it/them
     kʷədad+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcPl1: ʔukʷədadubuɬ # grabbed us 
     kʷədad+V+TV+Asp/Prf+ScCon+OcPl2: ʔukʷədadubuɬəd # grabbed you (guys)
     kʷədad+V+TV+Asp/Prf+Mid: ʔukʷədatəb # 
